Utah statutes.
3-1-6.   Filing articles of incorporation -- Certificate of incorporation --
Fees -- Constructive notice.
(1)  The articles of incorporation shall be filed with the Division of
Corporations and Commercial Code, which shall thereupon issue a certificate of
incorporation.  This certificate or a certified copy of the same shall be
prima facie evidence of the due incorporation of the association.  Upon the
issuance of such certificate of incorporation, the corporate existence begins.
(2)  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall establish a fee
pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for filing articles of incorporation with the
division, for securing a certified copy of the articles, for the issuance of a
certificate of incorporation, and for filing amendments to the articles,
whether incorporated with or without stock.
(3)  No person dealing with the association may be charged with constructive
notice of the contents of the articles or amendments thereto by reason of such
filing or recording.
